Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-114
Meetings; office; branch offices; seal; certified copies of records as evidence.

The office of the commission shall be in Lincoln, but the commission may, with the approval of the Governor, establish and maintain branch offices at places other than the seat of government. The commission shall hold regular meetings at least once a month and may hold such special meetings as it deems necessary at any time and at any place within the state. The commission may, for authentication of its records, process, and proceedings, adopt, keep, and use a common seal, of which seal judicial notice shall be taken in all of the courts of the state. Any process, notice, or other paper which the commission is authorized by law to issue shall be deemed sufficient if signed by the chairperson and executive director of the commission and authenticated by such seal. All acts, orders, proceedings, rules, regulations, entries, minutes, and other records of the commission and all reports and documents filed with the commission may be proved in any court of this state by copy thereof certified to by the executive director attached.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 15, p. 382;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-315;

R.S.1943, § 53-114;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 780, § 7.

Member of Liquor Control Commission is not required to reside in Lincoln. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).